New York, session 2025-2026, A3648.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 740 of the labor law, as amended 2 by chapter 522 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as follows: 3 2. Prohibitions. An employer shall not take any retaliatory action 4 against an employee, whether or not within the scope of the employee's 5 job duties, because such employee does any of the following: 6 (a) discloses, or threatens to disclose to a supervisor or to a public 7 body an activity, policy or practice of the employer that the employee 8 reasonably believes is in violation of law, rule or regulation or that 9 the employee reasonably believes poses a substantial and specific danger 10 to the public health or safety, or which constitutes discrimination in 11 violation of article fifteen of the executive law; 12 (b) provides information to, or testifies before, any public body 13 conducting an investigation, hearing or inquiry into any such activity, 14 policy or practice by such employer; [or] 15 (c) objects to, or refuses to participate in any such activity, policy 16 or practice; or 17 (d) files a complaint with such employer alleging discrimination in 18 violation of article fifteen of the executive law, or files a complaint 19 pursuant to a policy adopted or established by such employer as required 20 by section two hundred one-g of this chapter. 21 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD06406-01-5